Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 2 STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY
44-10-204. Confidentiality.

The state licensing authority shall maintain the confidentiality of:

Reports or other information obtained from a medical marijuana or retail marijuana licensee or a medical marijuana or retail marijuana license applicant containing any individualized data, information, or records related to the applicant or licensee or its operation, including sales information, leases, business organization records, financial records, tax returns, credit reports, cultivation information, testing results, and security information and plans, or revealing any customer information, or any other records that are exempt from public inspection pursuant to state law. Such reports or other information may be used only for a purpose authorized by this article 10, for investigation or enforcement of any international, federal, state, or local securities law or regulations, or for any other state or local law enforcement purpose. Any information released related to patients may be used only for a purpose authorized by this article 10, to verify that a person who presented a registry identification card issued pursuant to section 25-1.5-106 (9) to a state or local law enforcement official is lawfully in possession of such card, as a part of an active investigation, as a part of a proceeding authorized by this article 10 or article 1.5 of title 25, or for any state or local law enforcement purpose involving evidence of sales transactions in violation of this article 10 or evidence of criminal activity. The information or records related to a patient constitute medical data as described by section 24-72-204 (3)(a)(I), and the information or records may only be disclosed to those persons directly involved with an active investigation or proceeding. Any customer information may be used only for a purpose authorized by this article 10.

Investigative records and documents related to ongoing investigations. Those records and documents may be used only for a purpose authorized by this article 10 or for any other state or local law enforcement purpose.

Computer systems maintained by the state licensing authority and the vendors with which the state licensing authority has contracted.

The state licensing authority shall make available for public inspection:

Documents related to final agency actions and orders;

Records related to testing on an aggregated and de-identified basis;

Demographic information related to applicants and licensees available on an aggregated and de-identified basis; and

Enforcement forms and compliance checklists.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2856, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

44-10-205. Change designation of marijuana from medical to retail - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1216), ch. 306, p. 1834, § 6, effective June 23.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2021, p. 1834.)

44-10-206. Task force - creation - report - repeal.

The state licensing authority shall create a task force to study intoxicating hemp products and make legislative and rule recommendations. The executive director shall convene the task force by September 1, 2022. The task force consists of the following representatives:

One representative appointed by the executive director to represent the state licensing authority;

One representative appointed by the executive director of the department of public health and environment;

One representative appointed by the attorney general;

One representative appointed by the commissioner of agriculture;

One representative appointed by the executive director who is an attorney with expertise in the regulation of marijuana;

Four representatives appointed by the executive director to represent persons licensed under this article 10 as a medical marijuana cultivation facility, medical marijuana products manufacturer, retail marijuana cultivation facility, or retail marijuana products manufacturer;

One representative appointed by the executive director of the department of public health and environment, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, who is an attorney with expertise in the regulation of industrial hemp;

One representative appointed by the executive director of the department of public health and environment, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, to represent hemp refiners;

One representative appointed by the executive director to represent a consumer nonprofit organization;

One representative appointed by the executive director of the department of public health and environment, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, to represent full spectrum industrial hemp producers;

One representative appointed by the executive director to represent medical patients;

Two representatives appointed by the executive director of the department of public health and environment, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, to represent persons who sell hemp at retail;

Two representatives appointed by the executive director to represent persons licensed under this article 10 as a medical marijuana store or as a retail marijuana store;

One representative appointed by the executive director of the department of public health and environment, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, to represent testing labs; and

One representative appointed by the executive director to represent a county or district public health agency established under section 25-1-506.

The task force shall submit a report to the general assembly by January 1, 2023. The report must contain any of the task force's legislative recommendations concerning the regulation of industrial hemp and an analysis of the effectiveness of each recommendation.

As a part of the report, the task force shall make rule recommendations concerning the regulation of intoxicating hemp products.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-205), ch. 278, p. 2000, § 2, effective May 31.